 In the meantime, we have mice that are 4 months old and do not have diabetes, but that earlier had it.
 Professor Ehud Ur in medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, also chair of the clinical and scientific division of the Canadian Diabetes Association, reminded us that they're only just beginning the research.
 Like some other experts, he is sceptical about the question of whether his diabetes can be cured, noting that these findings have no value for people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Nobel Committee for Literature at the Swedish Academy, announced on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the committee could not immediately reach Bob Dylan to tell him that he had won the Nobel Prize for Literature in 2016 and would not make any more effort to reach him.
 Danius declared, we're doing nothing at the moment . I've called and emailed his closest aide and received friendly replies.
 Earlier, Jamie Siminoff, the CEO of Ring, noted that the company was founded when his doorbell from the store was not audible in his garage.
 He said that he made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said that sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in 2013, where the show's panel of investors did not want to fund the start-up.
 At the end of 2017, Siminoff was featured on the teleshopping channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with the ADT Corporation, a competing security company.
 One experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola deaths, but so far no medicines are clearly suitable for the treatment of existing infections.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, was initially much-hyped in the field, but official trials showed it had less benefits than hoped.
 ZMapp was a control in the PALM trial, so scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatment methods to it.
 The U S . Olympic Committee has the support of USA Gymnastics and understands that it is necessary for the Olympic family to promote a safe place for all athletes.
 We join the USOC in saying that it is best for our athletes and clubs, and their sport, to make meaningful changes to our organization instead of taking certifications away.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can provide more clarity on how abuse, so bravely described by the survivors of Larry Nassar, could go unchecked for so long, and embraces all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the U.S. Olympic Committee have the same goal: to ensure that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowering environment through the sport of gymnastics.
 During the 60s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor for John F. Kennedy and later for the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 He advised Carter during the 1976 selections, and then followed Henry Kissinger as National Security Advisor, serving from 1977 to 1981.
 As NSA, he stood Carter by in the diplomatic handling of worldwide issues, such as the Camp David accords in 1978, stabilizing the relationship between the U.S. and China at the end of the 1970s, and the Iranian Revolution, the ensuing hostage crisis, and the invasion of Afghanistan by the Soviet Union in 1979.
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone was nominated for all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Among the other nominations were Best Picture, Director, Cinematography, Costume Design, Film Editing, Original Music, Production Design, Music, Sound Effects and Original Screenplay.
 The songs Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars from the film were nominated for Best Original Song, and Lionsgate received 26 nominations, a record for a studio.
 In a statement from his press Secretary, U S . President Donald Trump said Sunday night that U S . troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone call between Trump and the Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 The Turks also gave the communiqué, according to the communiqué, that they would guard the captured fighters of Isis, whom Europe did not want to take back.
 This proves not only the widespread theory that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, but also provides more details than fossils, such as the color and three-dimensional placement.
 According to scientists, the feathers of this bird were chestnut-brown with a pale or carotenoid-coloured underside.
 The find also gives insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The researchers concluded that the rachis was probably a later evolutionary development, because dinosaur feathers do not have a well-developed shaft, or rachis, but do have other characteristics of feathers, such as spines.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but to regulate temperature or to show off. The researchers suggested that this is the tail of a young dinosaur, but that this monster shows adult feathers and so is not the down of a chick.
 The researchers suggested that, despite the tail being that of a young dinosaur, the monster had the plumage of an adult and not the down of a chick.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded outside the main headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty other people.
 Among the wounded are nineteen police officers, said the governor.
 The police suspect a Daesh militant of the attack.
 It has a notably wide variety of plant communities, due to its range of microclimates, differing soils and varying levels of altitude.
 The brightness and rotation are used to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to plasma streaming.
 The smaller the number of Rossby waves, the less active the star is when it comes to magnetic reversals.
 Iwasaki ran into trouble at various points during his trip.
 Pirates robbed him, a mad dog fell upon him in Tibet, a hound in Nepal, and he was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard is compatible with both frequencies: 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 If the basic station has dual radios, this backwards compatibility makes it possible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g.
 Speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of predecessors with a maximum theoretical capacity of 600Mbit/s.
 Duvall is married with two children and made no great impression on Miller, to whom the story was related.
 On a request for comment, Millar responded,
 We are doing our utmost to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP in 2020 by a significant margin compared to the level of 2005.
 He has not set any figures for the cuts, saying that these will be determined on the basis of China's economic output.
 Hu urged developing countries to avoid the old way of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added that they should not be asked to undertake obligations that are beyond their development, level, responsibility and capabilities.
 The Iraqi study group presented their report today at 12.00 GMT.
 The warning is that no one can guarantee that no single act in Iraq at this moment will end sectarian warfare, increasing violence or the tendency towards chaos.
 In the beginning of the report there is a plea for an open discussion and for consensus-building in the USA over the policy with regard to the Middle East.
 The report strongly criticises almost every element of the current administration's policy towards Iraq and urges a different course.
 The report contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is that this year diplomatic action must be taken to protect the Iraqi borders from hostile powers and to restore diplomatic relations with neighbouring countries.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, Senator and wife of the Argentine President, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 km away from Buenos Aires, that she intends to run for President.
 Kirchner announced her intention to run for the Presidency in the Argentine theatre, where she started her campaign for the Senate in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires provincial delegation.
 The debate arose from a discussion over investing and rebuilding after Hurricane Katrina, and some fiscal conservatives jokingly called it the New Orleans deal of Bush.
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction work is directed at the awarding of reconstruction contracts to alleged insiders from Washington.
 The funeral was attended by more than four million people in Rome.
 There were so many people that not everyone could get access to the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 On different places in Rome, large television screens were placed so that people could see the ceremony.
 Sort of similar setups were made in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, and then especially in Poland, where a great number of people watched it.
 Historians have criticized earlier FBI policies because they focused their resources on easily solved cases, mainly car thefts, in order to boost the Bureau's success ratio.
 As of fiscal year 2005, the Congress funded the initiative against obscenity and declared that the FBI must deploy ten agents on adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings with 70 runs with just 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 In the middle order, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well and made a combined hundred runs.
 But after India lost the wicket of the captain, they scored only 36 runs while losing 7 wickets to end the innings.
 President George W . Bush arrived in the morning of November 16 in Singapore for a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was received by Wong Kan Seng, the vice-premier of Singapore, and discussed problems in the areas of trade and terrorism with the Prime Minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush spoke to a public audience this week about increasing trade ties with Asia.
 Premier Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee for all parties for review, prior to the second reading, after the 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton at PMO on Tuesday.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton asked for changes in the Conservative's environment act, asking for it to be, quote,
 Since the Federal Government took over funding from the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, some Federal parliamentarians have criticised this law as a stunt during the beginning period of the Federal election, which is held in November.
 Minister-President John Howard has however stated that the law was only intended to prevent the Tasmanian government from cutting back on the hospital's services by withdrawing the extra 45 million Australian dollars.
 According to the latest bulletin, the sea level indicated a tsunami. There was some clear tsunami activity registered near Pago Pago and Niue.
 There was no major damage or serious injury reported, although power was out for some time, leading the Tongan authorities to believe the PTWC tsunami warning was not received.
 The warnings were withdrawn, but fourteen schools in Hawaii were closed Wednesday, all along or near coastlines.
 George W . Bush, the leader of the U S ., cheered the announcement.
 A spokesman for Bush, Gordon Johndroe, described the promise of North Korea as a great step forward in our goal to denuclearize the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season to receive a name, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed today over the Atlantic Ocean.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, Jerry is not currently a threat to the mainland.
 According to the U.S. Corps of Engineers, six inches of rain could possibly breach the earlier damaged levees.
 In the Ninth Ward, the water during Hurricane Katrina stood at more than 20 feet high, still standing at the middle, because the nearby levee could not hold back the water.
 The water flows over a stretch of 100 feet wide over the dike.
 The Commons-Beheerder Adam Cuerden voiced his frustrations over the removal during his conversation with Wikinews last month.
 Wales lied in principle to us from the beginning, firstly by pretending it was about legal reasons, secondly by pretending he was listening to us, until he removed the art.
 The irritations within the community resulted in the current attempts to set a policy regarding sexual content of the site that hosts millions of pieces of media content with an open license.
 The completed work was primarily theoretical in nature, but the program is written for the simulation of observations of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The team was looking for the effect that would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the whole and that of the Milky way.
 Similar to how the moon exerts power on the earth, which leads to tides, the Milky Way exerts power on the Sagittarius Star-System.
 The researchers concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, the majority of dark matter in a Galaxy cluster is found around it, in a sort of ring, and consists of a large number of smaller particles.
 On television footage you can see white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are giving the following warning: residents living near the factory should stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 The Japanese agency for nuclear energy reports that radioactive cesium and jodine have been observed at the factory.
 Authorities suspect that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel may have been torn open and leaking.
 XDR-TB was discovered by Dr Tony Moll in the province of KwaZulu-Natal in South Africa.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is very worrying and concerning because of the very high death rate.
 Dr Moll thinks some patients have caught the disease in the hospital, including two nurses from the hospital.
 A contaminated person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts in a year.
 The percentage of XDR-TB among all tuberculosis patients seems, however, still low at 6000 out of 330,000 infected people in total at any one time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which both weighed more than 1,000 pounds and traveled at about 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above the earth.
 Scientists say that a huge explosion was created by the collision.
 They are trying to figure out how big the collision was and how it will affect the earth.
 The United States Strategic Command of the United States Department of Defense traces the debris.
 On a public Website, the result of the plot analysis is posted.
 According to official sources in Ohio, a doctor from the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is charged with murder with aggravating circumstances after the body of her mother was found Wednesday in the trunk of her car.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in his T-shirt, underwear and heavily medicated state along a highway in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati.
 She sent officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 At this point, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanianaan, age 53, covered with bloody sheets.
 The police stated that the body had lain there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease were reported this season at the end of July.
 Pigs carry the disease and transmit it via mosquitoes to humans.
 The government of India has decided to deploy people who catch pigs in the worst hit parts of the country, to distribute thousands of mosquito nets and to distribute pesticides.
 The government has promised several million encephalitis vaccines so that health authorities can prepare for next year.
 The plans to deliver vaccines this year to the places that have historically been the most hit are delayed because of a lack of funding and the low priority of other diseases.
 Słania moved to Sweden in 1956, where he worked for three years as a chief engraver at the Swedish postal service.
 He produced more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and another 28 countries.
 His work is recognized for the quality and detail and his name is a household name among stamp collectors, some of whom focus only on his work.
 The beautiful stamp, Great Deeds by Swedish Kings', made by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl in 2000 and mentioned in the Guinness Book of Records, was his 1,000th stamp.
 For many countries he brought engravings to the banknotes, recent examples of his work are the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new Canadian banknotes of 5 and 100 dollars.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to the hospital where he died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 12.00 GMT the same day.
 A garage worker near the accident said, there were children waiting to cross and they were all crying and screaming.
 They all ran back from the scene of the accident.
 Other issues on the agenda include the protection of remaining forests in the world, as well as sharing technologies to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN hopes to set up a fund to help countries deal with the effects of global warming.
 Flood-resistant housing, more efficient water management and diversification of crops could be investments where the money could be used for.
 Fluke wrote the following: some men tried to stop women from speaking out about women's health, but these efforts failed.
 This based on the many positive comments and support from both men and women who found that contraception should be considered as a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped after the wounded were transported to the hospital, about 40 of the other remaining prisoners stayed on the inner courtyard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators have made a bid to get the situation back on track, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 local time, the prisoners set fire to the inner courtyard.
 Agents, dressed in riot gear, soon came into the garden and drove the prisoners with tear gas into a corner.
 The firefighters were able to give the fire meister signal at 11:35 am.
 Seasonal flooding, which would have spread sediment throughout the river, ended after the dam was built in 1963.
 This sediment was needed for creating sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 The result was that two fish species became extinct and two other species are threatened with extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 After the flood, the water level is only expected to rise a few metres, but officials hope that this is enough to repair the eroded sandbanks that lie downstream.
 There was no tsunami warning issued, according to the Geophysical Bureau of Jakarta, because the earthquake was not of the magnitude of 6.5, which is the minimum requirement to issue a tsunami warning.
 There was no tsunami threat, but residents nonetheless panicked and left their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey, with tears in her eyes, said goodbye, she promised her fans she would return.
 I take no leave. This is the end of one chapter and the beginning of another.
 The Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections were won by the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, with a large lead.
 At the moment, the SWAPO (South West African People's Organisation) is the ruling party, with a majority in the elections for the parliament.
 The coalition and Afghan troops went into the area to secure the location and another coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The helicopter crashed high in mountainous terrain and it is suspected that this was caused by enemy fire.
 Attempts to locate the site of the accident are hampered by the bad weather and the rough terrain.
 According to the medical charity Mangola, Doctors without Borders and the World Health Organisation, it is the worst registered outbreak in the country.
 Richard Veerman, spokesperson for Doctors without Borders, says, Angola is on the way to the worst outbreak ever and the situation in the country remains very bad.
 It was a beautiful day when the tournament began at 10 a.m. Halfway through the morning, there was some light rain, but it cleared up quickly.
 Favourite of the tournament, South Africa, began well with a comfortable win of 26-00 against the as 5th placed Zambia.
 Although they played very stiffly against their Southern cousins, South Africa managed to improve themselves in the tournament.
 They fell on by their stiff defence, control over the ball and outstanding cooperation and were clearly the most important opponent.
 Amsterdam officials and staff of the Anne Frank House state that the tree has a fungus and poses a danger to public health, because the tree, according to them, could fall.
 The tree was due to be felled on Tuesday, but a court order stopped this.
 The entrances to the cave were called the Seven Sisters and all have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show that the temperature at night and during the day differs and show that it is probably caves.
 During the day they are cooler than the surrounding surface, and at night they are warmer.
 The thermal behaviour of these caves is not as stable as that of large caves on earth, which often maintain a fairly constant temperature,
 In France, there's been a long tradition of voting with little technology: Voters go into a booth, and drop a pre-printed piece of paper into an envelope that says who they're voting for.
 Officials first check the identity of the voter, then the voter slides the envelope into the ballot box and then signs the roll.
 The process is relatively tightly defined in the French electoral code.
 Ballot boxes must be transparent since 1988, so that both voters and observers can see that no envelopes are present at the beginning of the vote and that no other envelopes are added than those of registered and authorised voters.
 The candidates can send representatives to witness every part of the process, volunteers count the votes in the evening under strict supervision and according to specific procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, which was launched worldwide earlier due to cost saving and various functionalities, was extensively discussed in the Taipei IT Month of 2007.
 The consumer market for laptop computers, however, is very diverse and changed after ASUS won the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 from the executive yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station describes the show as old school hoorspel on the radio with a new and unheard twist.
 In the beginning, the show was only broadcast via the long-running radio Website TogiNet Radio, a Website about talk shows on the radio.
 At the end of 2015, the AstroNet Radio understation was established.
 Originally, local amateur voice actors from the East Texas area were used.
 The widespread looting went on, allegedly, at night, because there were no law enforcement officials in the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one person as an anarchistic state', where gangs roamed the streets and shops were looted.
 In Bishkek, the blame for the unrest was placed by multiple people at demonstrators from the South.
 In the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the South African town of Rustenburg, that same land had knocked out the New Zealand All Blacks in a Tri Nations rugby tournament.
 The final score was a one point win, 21 to 20, ending the 15 game winning streak of the All Blacks.
 For the Springboks, finally, they won after five matches in a row.
 It was the last match for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The last match of the series is next week in Ellis Park in Johannesburg, as the Springboks play in Australia.
 Monday at 10:08 a.m., the West of Montana was rocked by a moderate earthquake.
 There were no damage reports at the United States Geological Survey and the National Earthquake Information Centrum.
 The earthquake occurred about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 Monday a dead wild duck was found in the marshland of Lyon in the East of France, which has been confirmed to be infected with the H5N1 bird flu virus.
 After Italy, Greece, Bulgaria, Slovenia, Slovenia, Germany and Austria, France is the seventh country in the European Union where this virus is present.
 Possible H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers blamed God for the widespread killing, destruction and terrorizing of many millions of earth's inhabitants.
 Agnost Chambers says his lawsuit is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The French opera is a story by Camille Saint-Saens and is about an artist whose life is defined by the love for drugs and Japan.
 As a result, performers smoke cannabis on the stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas governor Rick Perry and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann ended up in fourth, fifth and sixth place respectively.
 When the results were known, Gingrich praised Santorum, but criticized Romney, for whom negative campaign ads against Gingrich had been published in Iowa.
 Perry stated that he would return to Texas to assess the results of the voting that night, to determine if there was still a chance for him in this election, but later said that he would finish the campaign and would compete in the January 21 South Carolina primary.
 The winner of the Ames Straw Poll in August, Bachmann, decided to end her campaign.
 He was then transported to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he died.
 According to sources, he was in his 20s. I was not present or directly involved in this unfortunate event, but I hold the family of the victim in my thoughts.
 The entertainment news Website TMZ says the photographer had parked his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and was trying to take pictures of the traffic control before he crossed the street and took more pictures, leading to the California highway patrol officer who was overseeing the traffic control to ask him twice to return to his car.
 The driver of the vehicle that caused the photographer to be hit, according to the police, is unlikely to be prosecuted.
 There are eighteen medals awarded each day, so many countries missed out on the podium.
 Among them are the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen yesterday became ninth in the standing event for women in the Super-G, and Finland, where Katja Saarinen became tenth in the same event.
 Though it is widely used, especially among non-Romani, the word Gypsy is often considered offensive because of its associations with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of Romani people.
 Arly Velasquez of Mexico ended up in the fifteenth place in the men's Super-G, while Adam Hall of New Zealand ended up in the ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The blind ski racer Maciej Krezel of the Polish men's team and his guide Anna Ogarzynska were thirteenth in the Super-G. The South Korean Jong Seork Park was twenty-fourth in the sitting Super-G for men.
 The UN peacekeeping force, which came to Haiti after the earthquake of 2010, is being blamed for the spread of the disease that broke out at the camp of the troops.
 It emerged from the trial that the waste from the UN camp was poorly treated, allowing bacteria to enter the Artibonite, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Haiti had not had the disease since 1800, until the troops arrived.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti spoke of independent students who said Nepalese UN peacekeepers had brought the disease without knowing it to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, the outbreak is likely caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient is in stable condition at Howard University Hospital.
 The patient had been to Nigeria, where the Ebola virus was already present in small numbers.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from being infected.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked in various roles on a number of series.
 He provided his voice in the 1980s to shows such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he worked with Brooks and Groening on The Simpsons and was responsible for recruiting the first writing team.
 After his departure from the series in 1993, he remained on paper executive producer, which allowed him to receive royalties for every episode, worth several tens of millions of dollars.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua reported earlier that a plane had been hijacked.
 Later reports show that there was a bomb threat in the plane, which forced it to return to Afghanistan and land in Kandahar.
 Initial reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after it was not allowed to make an emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Airplane crashes are common in Iran, which has a fleet of both civilian and military aircraft that is poorly maintained.
 International sanctions mean no new planes can be bought.
 Earlier this week, an accident with a police helicopter killed three people and injured three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced the worst airplane crash in years when a plane en route to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 on board.
 In the same month, a passenger plane crashed into a wall at Mashhad, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the rest of their tour.
 The tour of the rock band was to travel through the USA and Canada until sixteenth September.
 They canceled the tour after singer Steven Tyler was injured when he fell from the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tiebreak, after both men failed to give any points away as they served.
 Del Potro had an early lead in the second set, but here too a tiebreak followed after it was 6-6.
 Potro was treated on the shoulder, but managed to finish the match.
 The local start time of the program was 20.30 hours (15.00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country sang bhajans or religious songs at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening began with the singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakka Singh also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan, with the help of Raju Khandelwal.
 Lakkha Singh then sang the bhajans.
 Aan Baba Shyam were served 108 plates with Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism, these are 56 different edible articles, such as, sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc, which are offered to the Holy figure).
 Lakkha Singh has also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan, presented by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Thursday, Satoru Iwata, the director of Nintendo, unveiled the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution during the keynote presentation of the Tokyo Game Show.
 Just like a TV remote, the Controller uses two sensors near the TV to determine its position in a three-dimensional space.
 With this, players control actions and movements in video games by moving the device through the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and lay it out of the race.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso led the race for most of it, but lost the position directly after his pit stop, probably due to a badly placed right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher ended his race not long after Alonso due to the damage to the wheel suspension from the many duels during the race.
 In a transcript of the news conference, he said she was a cute little girl with a nice voice.
 I was moved every time we rehearsed it, from the bottom of my heart.
 On an internal camera, it was seen approximately 3 minutes after launch that much insulation foam was detached from the fuel tank.
 It is believed that these have not caused any damage to the shuttle.
 The director of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had fallen after the period we had concerns about.
 After five minutes the wind began, and a minute later it was already at 70 km/h. Then it started to rain, but so hard and so much that it felt like needles on your skin.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and when I tried to come to their aid, people were just pushing over two wheelchair users and pushing them away.
 The NHK reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reports that the earthquake caused no problems and that in the Shika nuclear power plant reactors 1 and 2 were stopped.
 According to reports, there are 9,400 households in the region without water and about 100 without power.
 Several roads are damaged, the railway service has been halted in the affected areas, and the Prefecture of Noto in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed for longer.
 One bomb exploded outside the office where the governor-general works.
 Within a period of two hours, three bombs exploded in the vicinity of government buildings.
 In some reports, the official death toll is eight, but official reports confirm a maximum of 30 wounded, although the final numbers are not yet known.
 In urine samples from pets that had died after eating contaminated pet food, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 Researchers at the University found that the two connections react with each other, forming crystals that can block the kidney function.
 Scientists found out that crystals are formed in cat urine when you add Melanin and Cyanuric acid to it.
 The composition of these crystals has similarities with that of the urine of the affected pets, compared with infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 I do not know if you realize this, but most goods from Central America entered this country without having to pay any tax.
 Eighty percent of our goods were taxed at rates from countries in the Middle Americas.
 That found me very odd, it was undoubtedly unfair.
 What I'm just saying is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, has signed a bill that would ban the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 Under this law, violent video games that are sold in the state of California must have a '18' sticker. Sale to a minor is punishable by a fine of $1,000 per offense.
 Kier Starmer QC, the director of the CPS, said this morning that he would prosecute both Pryce and Huhne.
 Huhne has resigned, and in the cabinet, Ed Davey is his replacement, while Norman Lamb is expected to take over Davey's role as Minister of Trade.
 Huhne and Pryce are expected to appear before the Westminster Magistrates Court on 16 February.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver of the vehicle.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in his arm and jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo a reconstructive facial operation.
 The weapon of Uka failed as he held it to the head of a fifth man, Schneider has chronic pain, is blind in one eye, missing a piece of skull and his face has been reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider, via a Video-Link from a U S . Air Force base in the country from which he hailed,
 Besides the event of Wednesday, Carpanedo also competed in two individual races of the championship.
 Her first was the slalom, where she got a Did Not Finish at her first run. 36 of the 116 competitors got the same result in that race.
 In the other race she competed in, the sitting giant slalom, she was tenth of the ladies, with a combined time of 4:41:30, which is 2:11:60 minutes slower than the Austrian winner Claudia Loesch, and 1:09:02 minutes slower than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 Four skiers from the women's group for the sitting slalom could not finish their runs, and it failed 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom to place themselves during the race.
 The stolen laptop and mobile phone have been recovered by the Madhya Pradesh police.
 According to assistant inspector general D. K. Arya, five of the rapists of the Swedish woman have been arrested and they have found her mobile phone and laptop.
 Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar are the suspects.
 According to police Commissioner Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the suspects had their faces covered when they appeared in court.
 There were three people in the house when the car hit the house, but none of them were injured.
 The driver, however, was seriously injured to the head.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while the emergency services tried to free the driver from the red Audi TT.
 Initially he was admitted to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has since been convicted in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court for the murder of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting the charge and trial, but the eye-witness report is possibly doctored because her story has been published many times.
 This is common practice in the rest of the UK, but justice in Scotland works differently and courts have deemed publication of photos as possibly prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes that, quote, journalists play a dangerous game when they publish photos of suspects.
 Crown Office has overall control over prosecutions and has told journalists that there will be no further statements, at least until charges are made.
 According to sources, the document refers to a settlement, something the Palestinians wanted on the basis of the borders before the war in the Middle East in 1967.
 Other topics discussed were the future status of Jerusalem, a city that is sacred to both peoples, and the problems in the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands that after signing a deal there be a permanent military presence in the valley for ten years, but the PA is only willing to accept a presence of five years.
 Shooters in the supplementary test for pest control had to be closely monitored by game wardens, as the test was being followed and its effectiveness assessed.
 A partnership between the NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, recruited qualified volunteers for the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of park heritage and estate at the NPWS, the four chosen shooters had a comprehensive safety and training instruction before the first shooting operation.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a nine-member Provisional Electoral Council of CEP.
 Hereby, Martelly has in the past four years, five times, achieved a CEP.
 Last month the Presidential Commission recommended the resignation of the previous National Election Committee as part of a package of measures to ensure new elections in the country.
 The Commission was set up by Martelly in response to widespread protests against the government that have been taking place since October.
 The sometimes violent protests erupted over the lack of elections, some of which had been due since 2011.
 There are about 60 reported cases of defective iPods overheating, resulting in six fires and four people with minor burns.
 The National Hurricane Center says that at this point, Jerry poses no threat to land.
 Last week, METI announced that Apple had reported 34 additional incidents of overheating that the company called 'not serious'.
 It's very regrettable', the Ministry said, of the fact that Apple has delayed the report.
 Mariana was hit by the earthquake at 07.19 am local time (Friday 21.19 GMT).
 The office of emergency management of the Northern Marianas Islands declared that there was no damage reported statewide.
 There was no tsunami warning issued by the National Tsunami Warning Center.
 In Manila, the Philippine capital, a former policeman from the Philippines has hijacked a bus, taking tourists from Hong Kong hostage.
 With his M16 rifle, Rolando Mendoza shot at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued and for now at least six dead have been confirmed.
 Six hostages were released earlier, including the children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers.
 Later, the photographers returned in exchange for an older woman who had to go to the toilet, Mendoza was eventually shot.
 Liggins went into medicine, following in his father's footsteps.
 Trained as a midwife, he began working in the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working at the hospital, Liggins did research into premature birth in his spare time.
 His research showed that the maturation of the Foetal lungs of babies was speeded up by the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported that researchers from the government found two black boxes with flight recorders Wednesday.
 Also medeworstelaars brought hulde to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, Luna was the first Queen of Extreme. My first manager. Luna passed away on the night of two moons.
 Dustin Runnels, who performed as Goldust, stated that Luna was as weird as he was, and that he loved her and would miss her.
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed for the 2010 Federal election, the number of people who opposed Australia becoming a Republic rose by 8 per cent since 2008.
 Demissionair Prime Minister Julia Gillard said during the campaign for the 2010 Federal Election that Australia should become a Republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty four percent of those polled supported this position, with 34 percent wanting the Queen to be the last monarch of Australia.
 Twenty nine percent of respondents thought that Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, and at the other end, thirty one percent said that it should never happen.
 The Olympic gold medallist swam the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relay events during the Commonwealth games, but his condition was questioned because of his complaints.
 He could not take the medicines he needed to ease his pain because they are banned at the games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and informatics professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered on January 25 the currently largest known prime number.
 Several people verified the discovery with different hardware and software and this was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets could have been a source of water on earth, together with organic material that forms proteins and supports life.
 Scientists hope to gain insight into how planets form, especially the earth, given that it's been a very long time since comets have collided with the earth.
 Cuomo, 53, was inaugurated as governor earlier this year and signed a law last month legalizing same-sex marriages.
 He called the rumors political nonsense and gossip.
 There are speculations that he will run for the Presidency in 2016.
 With the NextGen system, the FAA says, planes would be able to take shorter routes, saving millions of tons of fuel each year and lowering carbon emissions.
 It makes use of satellite-based technology, unlike older technologies with ground radars, which allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft much better and give pilots clearer information.
 No extra transport is being used and there are no underground trains stopping at Wembley Stadium, and parking and P&R are not accessible on the site.
 A possible lack of transportation made it more likely that the match would be played behind closed doors and without supporters.
 A study published Tuesday in the scientific Journal, Science, went over the formation of a new bird species on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that new species evolved within two generations, thought to be much longer because the cross-breeding of a native Darwin finch, the Middle Ground Finch, with an immigrant Cactus Finch, the Española Ground Finch, took longer.
 Gold can be worked into many forms. It can be rolled into small shapes.
 It can be drawn into a narrow thread that can be twisted and woven, it can be spun or rolled into plates.
 After it has been made very thin, it can be pasted onto another metal, and it can even be made so thin that it was sometimes used for the decoration of hand-painted illustrations in books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical substance. You make an indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The major religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christian.
 A measure of the amount of hydrogen ions in the chemical substance that is tested, the pH value is given.
 Hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron, and hydrogen ions are protons without electrons.
 Mix both dry powders together, make your hands wet and clean, and make a ball of it.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels strange and forms a sort of envelope.
 In the cities of Harappa and Mohenjodaro, almost every house had a flush toilet connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 There are sewerage remains found in houses in the Minoan cities on the Greek Islands of Crete and Santorini.
 There were already wc's in China, Egypt and Persia in the old days, wc's in the Roman era were often part of a public bathhouse, where both men and women came together in a mixed group.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you make use of a satellite.
 As soon as the space satellite receives the call, it immediately sends it back.
 The satellite is shot into space by a rocket, scientists make use of telescopes in space because the atmosphere of the earth distorts part of our light and image.
 To launch a satellite or telescope into space, you need a huge rocket that is more than 30 metres long.
 The wheel has changed the world incredibly, the most important thing the wheel has given us is an easier and faster transport.
 The train, the car and many other transportation vehicles are the result of this.
 There are cats of medium size that eat prey of medium size, from hares to antelopes and deer.
 Besides, there are many small cats (such as stray cats kept as pets) that hunt on larger numbers of small prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 Their success comes from the idea of a niche, a special job that each cat has, so that they do not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social cats and live in large groups called prides.
 Troops consist of one to three adult males who are family, and have up to thirty females and Welps.
 The women are normally closely related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 A troop of lions behaves much the same as a pack of wolves or dogs, animals that surprisingly much resemble lions, but not other big cats,
 The tiger is a versatile athlete and can climb, swim, jump great distances and has five times the pulling power of a strong person.
 The tiger belongs to the same group (Genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, these four cat-like animals are the only ones that can roar.
 A tiger does not roar out of full power like a lion it is more as if he were growling a whole sentence.
 Ocelots' favorite meal is small animals. They catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds if they can.
 Scholars suspect that ocelots use their sense of smell to hunt small animals, by smelling the ground where they have been.
 They can see very well in the dark and move very stealthily, Ocelots hunt by blending in with their surroundings and then pouncing on their prey.
 When a small group of organisms (a small population) breaks away from the large population from which they originated, for example by moving over a mountain range or river, or if they are moved to an island from which they cannot easily return, they are often in a different environment than before.
 In this new environment, other raw materials and other enemies come, so the new population must adapt or adjust to compete.
 Because they still need the same adaptations as before, the original population has not changed at all.
 As the new population began to adapt to the new environment, they also began to look less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different from each other that you can no longer call them the same species.
 This process is called speciation and simply holds the formation of new species in. Speciation is an unavoidable consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants produce oxygen that humans breathe in and they take up carbon dioxide that humans breathe out.
 Through photosynthesis, plants harvest their nutrients from the sun, and also provide shade.
 Our houses and clothing are made of plants. We eat mainly plants. Without plants, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus stood at the top of the food chain from that time, and had nothing to fear, except from other Mosasauruses.
 His long jaws had more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an extra set in the palate, which means nothing or no one could escape him.
 It's not certain, but it's possible that his tongue was forked, and he ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and maybe even his own kind.
 In water parties, nothing was safe from his attacks, even huge dinosaurs like the Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 Although most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans also had their share of strange or unusual delicacies, including boar, peacocks, snails and a kind of rodent called a Sleeper.
 Besides, there was a difference in the way poor people and women sat on chairs during meals, but rich men liked to have a banquet where they lay on their sides while eating.
 Meals from the Roman era contain no food that later came from America or Asia to Europe.
 They did not have, for example, maize, tomatoes, potatoes, cacao, and no ancient Roman ever ate a chicken.
 Babylonians made a primary temple for all their gods. This temple was seen as the home of that god.
 Men brought offerings to the gods and the priests tried to satisfy the needs of the gods by organizing ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had a public courtyard and a back room that was only accessible to priests.
 Sometimes towers in the form of pyramids, called ziggurats, were built as part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 Houses were not of great importance in the warm climate of the Middle East.
 The daily life of the Hebrew family took place mostly outdoors.
 Women cooked in the garden, shops were no more than a counter along the street, and stone was used to build houses.
 In the land of Canaan there were no large forests and therefore wood was enormously expensive.
 Greenland had few inhabitants, according to Norse legends, Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder, found Greenland on his way west, and gave it its name.
 He did this discovery, but there were Eskimo tribes living there at that time.
 Although all were Scandinavian, the people, the Royal family, customs and history of Sweden, Iceland, Denmark and Norway were very different.
 Perhaps after watching the movie National Treasure, you think there's a treasure map hidden behind the Declaration of Independence.
 That rests on a misconception, however. There is something written on the back, but it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the American Declaration of Independence, the words, 'Original American Declaration of Independence, July 4, 1776', are printed upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one is sure who wrote it, it is certain that the great parchment (29¾ by 24½ inches) was once rolled up for storage.
 It seems that the designation was simply added as a sort of label.
 Thanks to the D-Day landings and the fighting that followed, the North of France was liberated, but the South remained occupied.
 It was ruled by Vichy France, which were Frenchmen who sided with the Germans in 1940 and thus aided the enemy instead of fighting against them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France with Operation Dragoon.
 The Americans and the Free French had liberated South France within just two weeks, and then they set off to Germany.
 A civilization is a single culture shared by a large group of people who live and work together in a society.
 From the Latin civilis, which means civil, comes the term civilization, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or state, and that defines also in a certain way the size of the society.
 States are the forerunners of nations, a civilization suggests that knowledge is passed on over multiple generations, a lasting cultural footprint and balanced distribution.
 When minority cultures disappear, they often leave no relevant historical evidence behind, so they are not officially recognized as civilizations.
 During the revolution, thirteen states under the articles of Confederation formed a weak central government, consisting only of a Congress.
 Congress lacked the power to levy taxes, because there was no national executive or judicial authority, and state authorities often refused to cooperate.
 It also did not have the power to ignore tax laws and tariffs between states.
 First, all states had to unanimously agree to the articles before they could be amended, but the states did not take the national government so seriously, so their representatives often were absent.
 The Italian national football team is together with the German team the world's second most successful team and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and F1 motor racing.
 Winter sports are particularly popular in the northern regions, where Italians compete in international events and Olympic events.
 Japan consists of nearly 7,000 Islands, with Honshu being the largest Island.
 Because of the cluster of Islands over which Japan has control, Japan is geographically referred to as a 'Archipelago'.
 Taiwan's history begins in the 15th century, when seafarers from Europe sailed along the island and gave it the name Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch VOC established itself in the southwest of Taiwan as a base, where the VOC attacked the indigenous grain production processes and employed Chinese workers on rice and sugar plantations.
 In the year 1683, the Western and Northern coastal areas of Taiwan were conquered by troops of the Qing dynasty,
 After the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government in 1895 signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which transferred sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Built up of three large constructions, the Machu Picchu consists of Intihuatana, the temple of the sun and the Chamber with three windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt so that tourists get a better idea of how they used to look.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was restored. The renovation is still ongoing.
 For example, the most common photo format for still images worldwide is 35 mm, which was the usual film format at the end of the analogue film era.
 These are produced to this day, although it is mainly the ratio of the image that the digital camera's sensor has taken over.
 Strange as it may seem, 35 mm film is actually 36 mm wide, with a height of 24 mm.
 The aspect ratio of this size (divide by twelve to get the simplest ratio of whole numbers) would be 3:2.
 Many common Indelings (for example, APS-Like Indelings) are equal to or a close approximation of this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which many abuse and which many find ridiculous, is a simple guideline that makes the image dynamic, and yet also overviewable.
 The most effective place for the main subject lies at the intersection of the lines. So divide the image vertically and horizontally into three parts.
 In this period in the history of Europe, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was under fire.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity bound European states together, despite language differences and differences in customs.
 From the King to the ordinary citizen, his all-pervading power had an influence on everyone.
 One of the main principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church has money for this reason.
 The church had been the central authority in Rome for over a thousand years, and this relationship of power and money led many people to question whether this principle was being upheld.
 Britain set up a blockade of the seas, aimed at Germany, shortly after the outbreak of hostilities.
 The strategy proved effective, because it was no longer possible to deliver vital supplies to civilians and military personnel, but it violated the generally accepted international law that had been established in the last two centuries in various international agreements.
 Britain had placed mines in international waters, so that no ships could sail in whole parts of the ocean, which was dangerous even for neutral ships.
 Because of the limited response to this tactic, Germany expected a similar response to the unrestrained undersea warfare of the country.
 During the years 20, most citizens and nations had a pacifist and isolationist attitude.
 After the first World War, states wanted to prevent such horrors from ever happening again.
 Tesla emigrated to the United States in 1884 to work for the Edison company in New York City.
 When he came to the United States, he had only 4 cents, a dime, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former boss, for Thomas Edison.
 China had a unique way of showing different time periods, each phase of China or each ruling family had a distinct dynasty.
 Also between the different dynasties there was an unstable period in which the provinces were divided, the most famous being the Three Kingdoms period, which took place in the 60 years between the Han and the Jin dynasties.
 In those times, there were fierce wars between different nobles who fought for the throne.
 In the history of ancient China, the time of the three kingdoms is one of the bloodiest. Thousands of people died in the struggle for the highest place in the great Palace in Xi'An.
 The Revolution had large social and political consequences, such as the use of the metric system, a shift from absolute monarchy to Republicanism, nationalism, and the view that the land belonged to its inhabitants rather than a single leader.
 For all male applicants, there were positions to be had after the revolution, so the most ambitious and suitable candidates could succeed.
 The same goes for the military. The military ranks are no longer based on one's class but on the caliber of the person.
 The French Revolution inspired the underprivileged working class in other countries to revolt.
 Mohammed was intensely occupied with supernatural matters, and he often went for meditation to a cave later known as the cave of Hira in the mountains of Noer.
 The grotto itself, which has withstood the ravages of time, gives a very vivid picture of the spirituality of Muhammad.
 The cave is located on one of the mountains to the north of Mecca and is completely sealed off from the rest of the world.
 Even though it was known that the cave existed, it was not easy to find, and once inside the cave, total isolation prevailed.
 The only thing to be seen is the clear, beautiful sky and the many surrounding mountains. There is very little of this world to be seen or heard from the cave.
 The great pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands.
 The great pyramid was built in the third century BC by the Egyptians and is one of many great pyramid structures built in honour of a dead pharaoh.
 The plateau of Giza or the pyramids of Giza in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings contains several pyramids, including the largest pyramid, the great Sphinx, and several smaller tombs.
 The great pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu, many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built as tributes to Khufu's wives and family members.
 The up-bow sign looks like a V and the down-bow sign looks like a notch or a square with the bottom missing.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic areas in the winter you will experience the polar night, which means that the sun doesn't rise above the horizon.
 An upward movement gives a softer sound, while a downward movement produces a stronger and assertive sound.
 Take the freedom to sketch your personal signs, but do not forget that the printed staff-lines are there for a musical reason, and therefore must usually be respected.
 A group of market women sat behind the departure of the doomed Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette and their two young children, Marie Therese, aged 11, and Louis-Charles, aged 4, and the King's sister, Madame Elizabeth, from Versailles to Paris.
 They rode back to the French capital in a carriage, surrounded by jeering and threatening mobs who threatened the King and Queen.
 Through the actions of the menacing crowd, the King and Queen were forced to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At one point, a man in the crowd held up the head of a Royal guard who had been murdered in Versailles for the eyes of a terrified queen.
 The war costs of U S . imperialism with regard to the conquest of the Philippines have been paid by the people of the Philippines.
 They were imposed on the American colonial regime to pay taxes to finance a large part of the costs and the interest on bonds was issued through the banks on Wall Street in the name of the Philippine government.
 American imperialism rested in large part on the enormous profits of the long-term exploitation of the Philippines.
 To understand the Templars, one must know the context that gave rise to the order.
 The time period in which this happened is generally referred to as the High Middle Ages, the European history in the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000-1300 n.Chr.).
 After the early Middle Ages came the high Middle Ages, which were in turn followed by the late Middle Ages, which usually end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term for a great assortment of ideas in practice: from technological necessity or the technological imperative to a strict feeling that human destiny is driven by an underlying logic that is linked to scientific laws and the appearance thereof in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism have these two general views: the development of technology follows a trajectory that for the most part extends beyond cultural or political influence, and that technology in turn has effects on societies that are inherent rather than socially conditioned.
 Some will say, for example, that the arrival of the car automatically leads to the construction of roads.
 A national road network is economically not feasible for but a few cars, so new production methods are being developed to lower the cost of car ownership.
 The massive car ownership also leads to a greater number of accidents on the road and this leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health care to be able to repair the human body.
 In the romanticism, a great part of cultural determinism was included, which was derived from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the Romanticism, geography formed the individual and over time, habits and cultures emerged as a result of this geography, which formed a harmonious society and were better than the arbitrary laws imposed.
 Constantinople was seen as the fashion capital of feudal Europe, just as Paris is today.
 It stood from about 400 to 1100 after Christ as a center of luxury.
 The status of the Byzantine Empire took a nosedive in the 12th century, mainly because the crusaders returned with silk and spices that were worth more than what the Byzantine markets could offer.
 Around this time, Paris also took over the title of fashion capital from Constantinople.
 The Gothic period was at its height in the 10th, 11th and 14th centuries.
 Clothing was in the beginning strongly influenced by Byzantine culture from the East.
 Because of the slow communication channels, styles in the West, however, lagged 25 to 30 years behind.
 At the end of the Middle Ages, a distinctive style began to develop in Western Europe, one of the greatest developments was the result of the Crusades, people began using knots to fasten their clothing.
 Self-sufficiency is a term used to describe a situation in which a person or a group produces enough food to meet their own needs.
 Agriculture, with the aim of subsistence, is a simple system that mostly uses stored seed that is native to the ecoregion, and that is combined with variable crops or other relatively simple techniques to optimize the yield.
 In the past, most farmers worked in self-sufficient agriculture, and in many developing countries this is still the case.
 Subcultures ensure that like-minded people who feel neglected by societal norms are brought together, giving them the opportunity to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnicity, social class, location and/or gender of their members.
 A subculture can be defined by the following types of qualities: linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or one or more of these factors together.
 Members of a subculture often show which group they belong to by a certain symbolic style in what they wear, in how they behave and the jargon they speak.
 One of the most used methods for illustrating the importance of socialization was the pair of unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, adversity or willful misuse, were not socialized by adults.
 They are called Wolfskinderen or wild children'. Some Wolfskinderen have been locked up by humans, mostly their own parents, sometimes they were left behind because the parents did not want to accept the serious mental or physical disability of the child.
 Unmanageable children may have experienced severe child maltreatment or a serious trauma before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Others are said to have been brought up by animals, and some are said to have lived only in the wilderness.
 A wild child who has not been raised by humans may exhibit behavior that resembles the behavior of the animal it cared for, within physical limits, such as fear of or indifference to humans.
 Learning on a project basis should simplify and make education more interesting, but scaffolding goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method but a tool to support individuals who are dealing with a new learning experience, for example, a new computer program or who are starting a new project.
 Support can be virtual or real, a teacher is a form of support, but the paperclipmannetje of Microsoft office is that too.
 There is virtual scaffolding built into the software that asks questions, offers memory aids and explains procedures that may be difficult to understand without help.
 There are several reasons that children end up in foster care, such as neglect, abuse and exploitation.
 No child should grow up in an environment where they are not well cared for, where they are not given attention and where they cannot develop.
 The foster care system is considered a safe zone for these children.
 It is the intention that foster care provides a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 In foster care, all needs that were neglected in the earlier home must be met.
 On the Internet, components of interpersonal and mass communication are being merged.
 The different characters of the Internet lead to new dimensions in the application of the Uses and Gratifications theory.
 Learning and socialization are, for example, cited as important reasons for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 Eighmey and McCord (1998) introduced new motivation aspects such as personal betrokkenheid and aanhoudende relaties when they researched the public's reactions to Websites.
 That using Video-Recordings led to remarkable findings in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, that are facial movements that last a few milliseconds.
 It is claimed that no one can recognise a lie by looking at micro-expressions alone.
 Oliver Sacks described in his essay The President's Speech how people who cannot understand speech due to brain damage can nevertheless accurately gauge its sincerity.
 He suggested that other animal species, such as household dogs, also possess the ability to interpret human behaviour.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two groups of genetic variants, hidden and visible.
 Mutation adds new genetic variation, and selection eliminates this variation from the pool of expressed variation.
 For each generation, there is variation between the two groups by means of separation and re-combination.
 A primate with a digestive system that looks like that of humans can thrive on the savannah but have difficulty getting the necessary amino acids from the plant sources there.
 Further, it cannot take serious consequences seriously: growth retardation, malnutrition and eventually even death.
 The easiest plant sources to find are the proteins in leaves and pea pods, but unless they are cooked, they are difficult for primates like us to digest.
 Not only is animal food (ants, termites, eggs) lightly digestible, but it also contains very high amounts of proteins that contain all essential amino acids.
 All in all, we should not be surprised if our ancestors solved their protein problem in the same way as chimpanzees solve it today.
 Sleep disruption occurs when you wake up for a reason during your normal sleep period and then fall back to sleep within a short time (10 to 60 minutes).
 This is fairly easy to do by using a relatively soft alarm clock that brings you back to your awareness without immediately waking you up completely.
 If you set your clock in your sleep, you can set it on the other side of the room so that you have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options based on the biorhythm are, for example, drinking a lot of fluid before going to sleep (and then mainly water or tea, a known diuretic), so that you have to get up to urinate.
 The amount of inner calm a person possesses is in direct opposition to the amount of stress they carry in their body and mind.
 The less stress, the more positive the life force. Every human being is capable of reaching a state of total peace and contentment.
 Everyone can enlighten their mind. Only your own stress and negativity stand in the way.
 Tibetan Buddhism has its basis in the teachings of Buddha, but this form of Buddhism is expanded with the Mahayana path of love and with a great number of techniques from Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism consists of a relatively simple core of Kundalini yoga, meditation, and a following of universal love.
 Through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras and visualized images, the energy of Kundalini yoga is awakened.
 The core of Tibetan meditation is yoga with a deity as a focus, using visualization of various deities to cleanse energy channels, activate chakras, and bring the consciousness into an enlightened state.
 Because Germany was a common enemy in World War II, a collaboration between the USSR and the USA came to be. After the war, the conflicts between system, process and culture caused the countries to get into a fight with each other.
 The former allies stood two years after the war, face to face, this was the beginning of the cold war.
 The war would last 40 years and proxy wars took place on battlefields in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 Polish defensive troops held out only until 17 September 1939, when they had to retreat and reorganize along the bridgehead in Romania.
 These plans were however in one night overturned, when 800,000 soldiers from the Red Army of the Soviet Union formed the Latvian and Ukrainian fronts, after they occupied the Eastern parts of Poland, in violation of the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international peace treaties, both bilateral and multilateral.
 Goods transported by ship is the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the ocean.
 Traditionally, the Navy's job is to ensure that a country has the ability to transport people and goods, while the enemy's ability to transport people and goods is hampered.
 The U S . Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rainfall could breach the previously damaged levees.
 The German Navy tried to counter this traffic with U-Boats,
 Like the rest of Europe, Britain was probably in German hands if the Allies had failed.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated some 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 In the old days, cultures and tribes began to keep them so that they could always easily get their meat, milk and skins.
 Domesticated goats were usually kept in herds on a hill or other grazing area, guarded by a goat herder, often a child or younger person.
 Already in the 16th century, horse railways were built in England.
 Although horse railways consisted only of a rails of planks, the horses had to run faster and pull greater amounts than on the somewhat difficult roads of that time.
 Splint bars were used fairly early to hold rails in place, but gradually it was realised that rails would be more efficient if there was an iron point on the top.
 This was soon the gangway practice, but the iron resulted in more wear and tear on the wooden coach wheels.
 Iron wheels eventually replaced the wooden varieties. In 1767, the first fully iron rails were laid.
 The first form of transport we know is walking. Humans began walking upright two million years ago when Homo Erectus came up.
 Their predecessor, the Australopithecus, walked upright less often.
 In fossils of the Australopithecus of 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, two-legged specialisations are found.
 We can live more environmentally friendly, join a green movement or even act to alleviate future suffering.
 It is in many cases just like a symptomatic treatment, but if we want more than a temporary solution, we have to identify the cause of the problems and eliminate it.
 The scientific and technological developments of human society have undoubtedly changed the earth overwhelmingly, and the extravagant human lifestyle has exacerbated the problems.
 After the Declaration of Independence was adopted on July 4, a handwritten draft was sent to John Dunlap's printing shop a few blocks away.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made during the night, and are now better known as the Dunlap broadsides.
 John Nixon held the public reading of the document for the first time on July 8 in the garden of Independence Hall.
 One copy was sent to George Washington on July 6, and read to his troops in New York on July 9.
 The 25 Dunlap-Blair manuscripts are the oldest surviving copies of the document, the original handwritten copy having perished.
 Many paleontologists believe that dinosaurs still exist today. We call them birds.
 Many people do not consider them dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still make us think of dinosaurs.
 On their feet are claws and scales, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs, just like the Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 Manipulating data that is coded in Binary form is the basis for almost all computers that are used today.
 A Binary number can have only two values, 0 or 1, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or in computer language, bits.
 Internal poisoning is possible not directly clear symptoms such as vomiting are so common that a diagnosis cannot be made directly.
 The presence of open boxes of medicine or toxic household chemicals is the best indication of internal poisoning.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions for that particular poison.
 This insect group is formally called wantsen by entomologists.
 This term comes from a centuries-old agreement with bedbugs, which are insects that can parasitize very well on humans.
 Both red roaches and bed bugs are nest-bound, they have adapted to live in the nest or the house of their host.
 In the USA there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most common neurological condition in adults of both younger and middle age.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women are twice as likely to get MS as men.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their best interest, or that of their child, to raise a baby.
 These couples can choose to give their baby up for adoption.
 When a child is adopted, the parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 Discovering how the world works using the scientific method is the most important goal of science.
 To test it, however, is to test one or more potential assumptions, to place question marks, to make observations, as a guide for scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers turned to classical texts and in particular to the Bible in Latin.
 The standpoints of Aristotle with regard to science, including psychology, were accepted.
 The West understood Greek philosophy and science less and less as the knowledge of Greek declined.
 At physiological and behavioural observations of rhythms there is often a strong dependence on endogenous processes and the production via the biological clock.
 Most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals, live according to periodic rhythms, not just reacting to external periodic signals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that run a cycle for a certain time period, even if there are no external signals for it.
 The experiment of Hershey and Chase was one of the most important clues that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophage or viruses to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 Two experiments were performed, one experiment using radioactive phosphorus to mark the DNA in the faag,
 Mutations can have many different effects, depending on the type, the importance of the genetic material involved and whether the affected cells are dividing or not.
 Only mutations in kiembaancells are hereditary. Other mutations can cause cells to die or can cause cancer to arise.
 Nature tourism attracts people who like to visit nature areas because they want to enjoy the landscape, including the flora and fauna.
 On site, one can hunt, fish, photograph, observe birds, go to parks and study the ecosystem.
 An example is a visit to, photographing and learning about the orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people drive from small villages to their workplaces, passing people whose workplaces are in the village they just left.
 Everyone in this dynamic transport shuttle is in contact with and supports a transport system based on private cars.
 Science has shown that through this enormous carbon economy, the biosphere is no longer in the stable state that allowed human evolution to take place over the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transport systems, and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, problems with water quality or collapsing bridges rarely occur.
 How come that there are so many complaints about transport systems, why does it go wrong daily? Are transport technicians just incompetent or is it something more fundamental?
 A traffic stream is a view of the movements of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between the individuals.
 Unfortunately, it is hard to study the traffic flow, because the behaviour of drivers cannot be predicted with 100% certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers behave in a fairly predictable way, which means that traffic flows show some degree of consistency and that there is something to say about this in the field of mathematics.
 There are three core characteristics that have been linked to better traffic flow: (1) intensity, (2) density and (3) speed.
 With the help of those relationships, planning, designing and exploiting of road engineering facilities is made easier.
 Insects began flying first, thanks to their winged flight, they could escape enemies and find food and mates more efficiently.
 The advantage of most insects is that they can fold their wings along the body.
 This allows them to hide in a greater number of small places from predators.
 At the moment, only dragonflies and mayflies cannot fold their wings.
 A few thousand years ago, Aristarchus said that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 There were people who thought he was right, but many people believed the opposite, that the solar system moved around the earth, and the sun, and other stars.
 This sounds quite logical, because you don't feel the earth moving, do you?
 The Amazon River is the world's largest and second longest river and carries more than eight times as much water as the second largest.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on earth and has a width of six miles in some places.
 At least 20% of all the water that flows into the sea via the rivers comes from the Amazon.
 The main stream of the Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long. The water comes from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although building stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza remain unsurpassed in size and technical excellence of construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the new Kingdom admired the monument of their predecessors, which was then more than a thousand years old.
 There are approximately 800 inhabitants in Vatican City, which is the smallest independent country in the world and also the country with the lowest population.
 Italian is the official language for the Vatican's official communications and laws.
 Italian is the language most spoken by the people who work there, while Latin is used a lot during religious ceremonies.
 Everyone who lives in Vatican City is Roman Catholic.
 People have known the most basic chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper, from the earliest times, because these all occur naturally and it is fairly easy to extract them with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle speculated that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 This seemed more like what we know of the four states of matter (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma, but he also theorized that they pass into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are simply a combination of at least two metals, as you probably know, the periodic table contains many elements.
 Elements like calcium and potassium fall under the metals, there are of course metals like silver and gold.
 Alloys can also contain a small amount of non-metal elements, for example, carbon.
 Everything in the universe is built up from matter, all matter consists of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that there are a trillion atoms in the tip at the end of this sentence.
 The pencil was a faithful friend to many when it was launched.
 The pen, however, has been lowered in status and is used much less.
 Today, we write messages on a computer screen without ever needing a pencil sharpener.
 You might wonder what's going to happen to the keyboard once something new comes on the market.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to bring a nucleus together with many protons and neutrons.
 It's like pushing a heavy car up a hill . When the core is split again, some of the energy is released.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, which means that they break up at the slightest or smallest provocation.
 The surface of the moon is characterized by dust and rocky material. The crust is the outer layer of the moon.
 The crust is about 70 km thick at the nearest point and 100 km thick at the other side.
 The crust is thinner under the Maria and thicker under the high plateaus.
 There may be more mares on the side, because the crust there is thinner, and lava could come to the surface more easily.
 Content theories are aimed at finding out what moves and attracts people.
 This theory suggests that people have certain needs and or wants that are internalized as they mature.
 With these theories, they want to examine the reasons why certain people want certain things and which environmental factors influence them to do certain things or not.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Hertzberg's Motivation-Hygiene theory.
 There are two main ways in which managers tend to lead their former colleagues.
 This type of manager finds it difficult to make unpopular decisions and disciplinary measures, to hold evaluation meetings, to delegate and to hold people accountable.
 On the other side of the spectrum, this individual transforms into an unrecognisable individual, who feels that they have to change everything the team has done so far, and wants to own everything.
 Ultimately, the leader is responsible for the team's success and failure.
 This behavior often leads to a rift between the leaders and the team members.
 Virtual teams must meet the same standards of excellence as normal teams, although there are small differences.
 In most cases, virtual team members are the first point of contact for their direct physical group.
 Often, they're more independent than traditional team members, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The idea of a truly invisible team (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109) is a unique element of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team to whom each member reports, and the invisible team sets the standard for each member.
 Why would an organization want to begin the time-consuming process of setting up a learning organization? One of the goals for implementing organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 Creativity and resourcefulness come to light when all the means available within the functional departments of an organization are effectively employed.
 The result of this is that the process of an organization working together to overcome a hurdle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 To make innovation possible in an organization, management must create a culture that encourages innovation, shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 According to Angel (2006), organizations can perform better with an approach based on the continuum model.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thereby allowing the research field to be narrowed and more accurate data to be collected.
 The correlation between the pathology of the brain and behavior helps scientists during their research.
 It has long been known that different types of brain injury, trauma, wounds and tumors can influence behavior and lead to changes in mental capacity.
 As new technologies are developed, we are learning more and more about the structures and processes in the brain.
 This provides us with a lot of information and material to develop simulation models that give us more insight into the processes of our mind.
 AI does most people think of science fiction, but it's also an essential part of computer science, used in research into machine behaviour, learning and intelligent adaptation.
 Developing machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behaviour falls under research into AI.
 Some examples are management, planning, the ability to answer customer questions and recognize handwriting, voice and face.
 These are separate disciplines for finding solutions to problems in real life.
 Today, this system for artificial intelligence is widely used in economics, medicine, technology and the military, such as in various software applications for PCs and video games.
 For each class, many excursions are planned, often a teacher would take her pupils to places where a bus trip is not an option.
 Thanks to technological developments, virtual excursions are now possible, allowing learners to view artefacts in a museum, to go inside an aquarium or to see beautiful works of art.
 Virtually sharing an excursion is also a fantastic way to look back on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, students at Bennet school in North Carolina design a Website each year about their trip to the state capital, which is redesigned each year and previous versions are kept Online to serve as a placemat.
 Blogs can also help students to write better, often their grammar and spelling is poor at the beginning, but this changes quickly as they have an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical audience, the Blogger strives to improve the writing and avoid criticism.
 By Blogging, students are also forced to learn more about the world around them'. The need to keep the public interested inspires students to be smart and interesting.
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages learners to extend learning beyond the traditional school day.
 Blogs can help learners develop critical thinking skills by actively engaging in the discussion on the Internet, learners can find their own place in the context of other people's material and at the same time develop their own standpoint on certain issues.
 The bilingual capital of Canada is the charming Ottawa, full of art galleries and museums that display Canada in the past and the future.
 Further south you'll find Niagara falls, in the north you'll find the beautiful untouched Muskoka and more.
 This sort of thing makes Ontario typical to outsiders.
 Further north, large areas are sparsely populated, and some of these areas are even virtually uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that will surprise many: there are more African Americans living in the United States than the total population of Canada.
 The East African Islands are located along the East Coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and in terms of fauna it is almost a separate continent.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations or are connected with France and are known as luxurious Beach resorts.
 The Arabs also took the Islamic faith with them, after which it spread widely on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 Needless to say, if you know a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 The region borders the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west and the Sahel to the north.
 Women are advised to say that they are married, whether or not that is true.
 It also helps to wear rings around the finger.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can lead to behaviour that they see as intimidating and that it is customary to be followed, to be touched, etc.
 Be clear when you reject a man and do not be afraid to stand your ground.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the 10th century BC by Berber fishermen, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinids.
 The Portuguese destroyed the harbor and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca. After an earthquake in 1755, they left the city again.
 The Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city and named it Daru l-Bayad, the Spanish traders who settled here gave it the name Casablanca.
 In Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop.
 Around the old Medina you find many places where you can buy traditional Moroccan stuff, like tagines, pots, leather products, water pipes and other hebbedingetjes, but it's purely aimed at tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of Congo, located near Rwanda in the far East.
 In 2002, Goma was devastated when the Nyiragongo volcano spouted lava and buried the city's main streets, and especially the city center.
 Although Goma itself is relatively safe, you need to check the state of affairs with regard to the fighting that is going on in the province of North Kivu before visiting.
 Besides, the city is the base for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and you can find some of the cheapest trips for Mountain Gorilla tracking in Africa.
 With boda-boda, a motorbike taxi, you can get around Goma. The normal (local) price is about 500 Congolese Francs for the short ride.
 Timbuktu is relatively inaccessible and is nowadays used as a metaphor for exotic, far-off lands.
 Today, Timbuktu is a depauperate city, although the reputation of the city makes it a tourist attraction and it has a airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites because of desert storms.
 It was one of the main stops on the PBS exhibition, special wonders from the African world, by Henry Louis Gates.
 The city differs from the other cities in the country, because it has a more Arabic look than an African one.
 Kruger National Park is found in the northeast of South Africa and runs east along the border with Mozambique, in the north along the border with Zimbabwe, and the southern border is the Crocodile River.
 19,500 square kilometres is the park, divided into 14 various eco-zones, where various wild animal species are kept.
 As a major tourist attraction in South Africa, this park is the flagship of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 Like all South African national parks, there are daily conservation fees and entrance fees applicable.
 It can also be handy to buy a Wild Card, which offers or access to certain parts of parks in South Africa or to all national parks in South Africa.
 The whole territory of Hong Kong is named after Hong Kong Island, and that is considered by many tourists as the most important place.
 The great number of buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline is likened to a glittering bar graph that becomes visible thanks to the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best view of Hong Kong, leave the island and head to the waterfront of Kowloon on the other side.
 The vast majority of Hong Kong Island's population live very close to each other on reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 This is where the British colonists settled, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of the area, then this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove forests in the world, stretching 80 km from the coast into the Indian and Bengali interior.
 As with all South African National Parks, there are daily conservation and entry fees for the park.
 The forests, however, are more than just Mangrove-Mudflats—they also harbor a few of the last mighty stretches of jungle that once covered the Gangetic Plains.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which a third is peat and marsh.
 The Sundarbans are a wildlife sanctuary and in the area are now estimated to be 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 Axis deer.
 Over day busses leave from the station on the border of the districts (opposite the river). Most of them leave between 6.30 and 7.30 am, especially in the direction of the East and Jakar/Bumthang.
 It is wise to buy a ticket a few days earlier, because the local buses are often fully booked.
 In most neighborhoods, small Japanese Coaster buses drive comfortably and robustly.
 With shared taxis one can travel quickly and comfortably to nearby places such as Paro (150 ngultrum) and Punakha (200 ngultrum).
 The Oyapock bridge is a Cable-Stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River to connect the Brazilian city of Oiapoque and the French-Guyanese city of Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock.
 The two towers have a height of 83 meters. The building has a length of 378 meters and has two passages with a width of 3.50 meters.
 Under the bridge the water depth is 15 metres, and in August 2011 the construction of the bridge was completed, but it only opened to traffic in March 2017.
 According to the plan, the bridge will be fully operational in September 2017, when Brazilian customs posts are expected to be ready for use.
 The Guaraní was the most prominent indigenous group, living in the area that is now East Paraguay, living as semi-nomadic hunters and also doing self-sufficient farming.
 In the province of Chaco, other indigenous tribes, including the Guaycurú and Payaguá, lived, who found their food by hunting, fishing and gathering.
 Paraguay, formerly also called the great province of Indies, emerged in the 16th century when Spanish colonists encountered the indigenous population.
 There followed a three-century period of Spanish colonization.
 Asuncion was founded in 1537 and since then Paraguay has managed to retain much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 In December, the largest tournament of the year takes place on the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 Here are also smaller tournaments and matches to be seen at other times of the year.
 Check the Asociación Argentina de Polo for more information about tournaments and buying tickets for polo matches.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is roughly equivalent to the British pound.
 On the Islands there is only one bank, namely in Stanley opposite the shop FIC West. Here you can exchange money.
 In general, British pounds are accepted everywhere on the Islands, and in Stanley you can also often pay with credit cards and American dollars.
 On the remote Islands, you can probably not pay with a credit card, but probably with the British and American currency.
 Exchange your money again before you leave the Islands, as Falkland Island currency is very difficult to exchange outside.
 Montevideo lies below the equator, so when it's summer there, it's winter on the northern hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures can reach over 30°C.
 The winter can be deceptively cold: the temperature rarely goes below freezing, but the wind in combination with the humidity makes it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 The rainfall level remains about the same throughout the year, without any recognizable wet and dry periods.
 Many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, but wild animals are ultimately wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 In the park, keep at least 100 metres away from bears and wolves, and 25 metres away from all other wild animals.
 Elk, bison, reindeer, bears and about all other large animals can attack you, no matter how tame they seem.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they do not keep a proper distance. These animals are big, wild and possibly dangerous, so give them space.
 Bears and other wild animals are attracted by smells, so avoid wearing or cooking smelly food and keep the campsite clean.
 The capital of Samoa is Apia and the city with nearly 40,000 inhabitants lies on the island of Upolu.
 Around the year 1850, Apia was founded and it is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the harbor, later known as the infamous patent.
 Except for a British slag ship, all the ships were sunk, and nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the independence struggle by the Mau movement, the highest leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, came to a hand-gone violent nonviolent meeting in the city.
 There are many beaches, especially because of the two harbours of Auckland, the most popular being situated in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore in the North Harbour district stretch from North to South along the Tasman Sea, from Long Bay to Devonport.
 These are nearly all sandy beaches where it is safe to swim and most have pohutukawa trees that provide shade.
 At Waitemata's harbour, in the luxury suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, located in central Auckland, you'll find the Tamaki Drive beaches.
 These family beaches are sometimes crowded and have a good range of shops on the coast . Swimming is not unsafe.
 Number one is the most important local beer, which is not a complex beer, but pleasant and refreshing. The other local beer is called Manta.
 There are many French wines to be found, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better suited for traveling.
 The local drinking water can be safely drunk, but bottled water is also easy to find if you don't trust the local water.
 A flat white is a strange concept for Australians, black coffee is espresso, cappuccino has very little coffee and tea is served without milk.
 The warm chocolate milk is of Belgian quality. Fruit juices are expensive, but great.
 Trips to the Reef occur throughout the year and injuries resulting from these trips to the Reef are rare.
 Ask for expert advice and follow all signs and safety warnings.
 Kubuskwallen come from October to April in the vicinity of beaches and river mouths north of Town of 1770. Sometimes they come outside this period.
 Sharks do come, but they rarely attack humans, and most sharks are afraid of humans and would actually swim away.
 The main habitat of saltwater crocodiles is found in the river mouths north of Rockhampton and they normally do not live in the ocean.
 Reserving in advance provides peace of mind for the traveller, knowing that he has a place to sleep when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with certain hotels, although you can usually also book other accommodation forms, such as a camping pitch, via a travel agency.
 Travel agencies often offer packages with breakfast and transportation to and from the airport, and sometimes even packages with flight and hotel.
 They can also hold your reservation if you need a little longer to think about the offer or if you need documents for your destination, such as a visa.
 If you have a request or a change, you must do this via the travel agency instead of the hotel.
 For some festivals, the majority of attendees at music festivals choose to camp on site and most visitors consider this an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you need to be early to get a camping spot near the music.
 And remember, even when the music on the main stages has finished, there's likely to be music playing on other parts of the festival site until late in the evening.
 For families with children who are still young, there are special camping areas at some festivals.
 Look out for where your hut is if you cross the East Sea in winter, for the journey through the ice makes a tremendous noise if you are too close.
 Cruises to St Petersburg include time to explore the city. Passengers on the cruise are exempt from visa requirements.
 Casinos typically put themselves in the most advantageous position to maximize the time and money that guests spend.
 They normally have special offers on food, drink and entertainment to keep them in a good mood and to prevent them from leaving.
 Some locations offer free alcoholic drinks, but if people are drunk, it affects their judgment and all seasoned gamblers know that it is enormously important to stay sober.
 As you go high up the mountains or over mountain passes, you have to take into account that there may be snow or ice and the temperature can be extremely low.
 On icy and snowy roads there is little friction and it drives differently than asphalt.
 During snowstorms, a lot of snow can fall in a very short period of time, and cause a lot of damage.
 Also, visibility can be hampered by falling or blowing snow or by condensation or ice on the windows of the vehicle.
 On the other hand, ice and snow are normal in many countries and do not hamper traffic.
 The largest tourist attraction in Africa are safaris, which for many visitors are the highlight of their trip.
 Safari is a word that is used in popular usage to refer to traveling over land to view the beautiful African wildlife, especially on the Savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, often come close to cars and a standard outfit makes a good view possible.
 If you want to see lions, cheetahs and leopards, you need a telescope or you're unlikely to see them.
 A walking safari, also known as a Bushwalk or Loop Safari, involves walking for several hours or days in a row.
 The Paralympics are from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events being held at other locations in Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted the Olympic Games twice. The first time was in 1964.
 If you had already booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the delay was announced, you could be in a penibele situation.
 The cancellation policy varies, but as of late March, most Coronavirus-Based cancellation policies are no longer valid through July 2020, when the Olympic games were scheduled to take place.
 According to expectations, most tickets for events are expected to cost between ¥2,500 and ¥130,000. Normal tickets are expected to cost around ¥7,000.
 You can dry wet clothes by ironing them. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board available. You can often borrow these items even if they are not in the room.
 If no iron is available or if you do not want to wear ironed socks, you can also use a hairdryer if available.
 Make sure the stove is not too hot (this can cause the stove to shrink or, in extreme cases, to burn).
 You can purify water in different ways, some methods are effective at countering specific risks.
 In some areas it is sufficient to boil water for a minute, in other areas water must be boiled for several minutes.
 Not every filter is equally effective, so in case of doubt, it's best to drink water from a sealed bottle from a trusted company.
 Travellers can encounter animal pests that are not found in their own country.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, spread gifts or transmit infections.
 Normally, infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that injure or kill humans, are not considered pests.
 Tax-free shopping means that you can buy goods at certain locations that are exempt from tax and excise duties.
 Travellers going to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot of money, when it comes to products like alcohol and tobacco.
 Point Marion and Fairmont are connected via the Buffalo to Pittsburgh highway, you drive through a lot of abandoned back country, and that makes this a big challenge.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, keep your head down. You'll encounter many steep hills, narrow streets and sharp bends.
 The posted maximum speeds are noticeably lower than in earlier and succeeding areas -- usually about 35-40 mph,
 Surprisingly, you have a lot more reach here than in other corners of the route, like the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German baked goods taste fine, and in Bavaria, the baked goods are quite rich and varied, just like the baked goods of the Southern neighbor, Austria.
 You see a lot of fruit cakes. The cakes contain apples all year round, and in the summer months also cherries and plums.
 Many popular German pastries contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and taste great with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want a few small but mighty pastries, try some that are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen in the region.
 To make a curry, you need spicy and pungent ingredients, in combination with vegetables or meat.
 Depending on the amount of liquid, a curry can be dry or wet.
 In the interior of North India and also Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curries, while in South India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is used.
 Indonesian cuisine encompasses dishes from 17,000 Islands and is an overarching term for a variety of regional cuisines from throughout the country.
 But without additional information, the term refers to food that originally came from the central and eastern part of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine is now available throughout the archipelago and offers various simple, spiced dishes. The most common Javanese flavorings are nuts, peppers, sugar, and various fragrant herbs.
 Stirrups support the rider's feet and hang down on either side of the saddle.
 These are used by entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but manages to hang on with the foot in the stirrup, they can be pulled along with the horse.
 Most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, fairly narrow sole.
 Some saddles, and then especially English saddles, have safety bars, which can detach if a rider falls from the horse.
 Cochamó Valley - This is Chile's most popular climbing destination, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with many different large Granite walls and rocks.
 The mountain peaks offer a breathtaking view, with climbers from all parts of the world constantly discovering new routes on the rock walls that seem to have an endless potential.
 Winter sports where you descend, such as skiing and snowboarding, are very popular. You slide down a slope covered with snow with skis or a snowboard attached to your feet.
 Skiing is a popular recreational activity with many enthusiasts, who are sometimes called ski bums, who plan whole vacations around skiing at a particular location.
 Skiing has been around for a very long time: there are cave paintings of skiers dating back to 5000 BC.
 The beginning of ski sport dates at least to the 17th century and in 1861 the first recreational ski resort in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Backpacking with skis: this activity is also called off-piste skiing, ski touring or ski hiking.
 It's not quite the same, but it's like Alpine skiing or mountain climbing, which is done a lot on steep terrain.
 You can see the skiroute as a walking route.
 In good conditions you can cover greater distances than walking, but it rarely happens that you reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy rucksack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries, and normally, travellers have to apply for visas and go through passport controls several times.
 The Schengen area functions in this regard almost as one country.
 As long as you are in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 When you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa for each Schengen country separately, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition that indicates which produced items are antiques. Some tax offices give goods that are older than 100 years the definition antiques.
 The definition can vary per location. In North America, for example, the age limit is lower than in Europe.
 It is possible to mark handmade products as antiques, despite them being newer than similar mass-produced items.
 Among the Sámi, reindeer herding is an important form of livelihood, and the culture around the trade is also very important for many with other professions.
 Even traditionally, however, not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry, they supported themselves with fishing, hunting and such things.
 Many Sámi work in modern professions today, in Sápmi, tourism is a major source of income.
 The word Gypsy is used mainly by non-Roma, but it is also often considered offensive because of the associations with negative stereotypes and incorrect perceptions of the Roma.
 If there is a travel advice for the country you are going to, this can have consequences for your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments, but their advice is aimed at their own citizens.
 Americans in the Middle East, for example, may face different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 Advice includes only a brief summary of the political situation in a single country.
 They give a fleeting, general and extremely simplistic view in comparison to other, more detailed sources.
 Noodweer is the general term for any dangerous weather event that can lead to damage, severe social disruption or loss of human life.
 Overall, there are several types of extreme weather conditions that vary based on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Phenomena and effects of severe weather include, for example, high winds, hail, large amounts of precipitation, and forest fires, but also thunderstorms, tornadoes, water spouts, and hurricanes.
 Snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms are among other examples of regional and seasonal extreme weather events.
 Travellers are advised to be aware of the risks that severe weather conditions in their surroundings may bring, as these may also affect some travel plans.
 Anyone who wants to visit a country that is considered a war zone should be professionally trained.
 A search on the Internet for a course in hostile environments is likely to turn up the address of a local business.
 In a course, normally all issues that are raised here are dealt with in more detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course normally lasts 2 to 5 days and consists of role-playing, a lot of first aid and occasionally weapon training.
 There are many books and magazines with articles about survival in the wilderness, but there are very few publications about war zones.
 Travellers who have planned a sex change operation abroad need to make sure they have the right documentation for their return journey.
 It varies greatly whether governments want to issue passports without a gender marker, or to add a name or gender marker to documents.
 There is just as much difference in the willingness of foreign governments to recognise these documents.
 Searches at security controls have since 11 September 2001 become much more extensive.
 Transgender individuals who have not yet undergone surgery can assume that they will not emerge from this scan with intact privacy and dignity.
 Muistromen are the recurring surge of waves that break on a reef or something similar and stream onto the beach.
 Vanwege de onderwatertopologie bevindt de retourstroom zich in enkele diepere delen, where a fast current can arise to deep water.
 Most deaths occur as a result of exhaustion, trying to swim against the current, which could be impossible.
 When you're out of the strong current, it's so easy to swim back.
 Try to focus on a place where you're not gripped again, depending on your skills and if you're noticed, you can also wait for help.
 The shock of returning is worse than the culture shock, it lasts longer, and it can be more intense.
 Travellers who adapt easily to new cultures sometimes have difficulty in adapting to their own culture.
 If you have lived abroad and then returned, you have adapted to the new culture and in the process lost some of your own culture's habits.
 When you visit a formally arranged garden, collecting specimens is also going to get you ejected, without discussion.
 Mostly, there is not expected to be patience and understanding for travellers returning home.
 For children, the pyramid show with light and sound is one of the most interesting activities in the neighborhood.
 You see the pyramids in the dark and you see them in silence before the show begins.
 Often, the sound of vendors and tourists is always audible. The story of the light and sound is like that of a book.
 The Sphinx forms the background and is the narrator of a long story.
 The scenes appear as projections on the pyramids and the rest of the pyramids are illuminated.
 The Southern Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819 and have since been claimed by several nations, with sixteen bases active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula, the largest island being King George Island with the settlement Villa Las Estrellas.
 And others are Livingston Island, and Deception, here you find the full-streamed crater of an active volcano that serves as a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth lies on the southern side of the peninsula, near the border with the Bellingshausen Sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula turn into the plateau, after which they reappear to form the 360 km long Mount Ellsworth mountain chain, which is crossed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, also known as the Sentinel Range, includes the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, with Mount Vinson at 4,892 metres.
 A satellite phone can be your only option in remote locations where there is no mobile phone reception.
 A satellite phone is not really a replacement for a mobile phone, since you have to stand outside with a clear view of the satellite to make a phone call.
 This service is often used by the shipping industry, including pleasure craft, and for expeditions where there is a need for external data and communication.
 Your local telephone provider can give you more information about how you connect to this service.
 It's becoming increasingly popular for people planning a gap year to travel and learn.
 Especially school leavers make use of this to take a gap year before the university without any negative consequences for their education.
 Often, a study abroad experience can increase your chances of returning to higher education in your own country.
 Normally, there is a fee to enrol in these educational programmes.
 Finland is a fantastic destination for boating. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of islands, in the lakes and in the archipelagoes off the coast.
 A jacht is not necessary for the archipels or meres.
 The archipels along the coast and the largest lakes are indeed large enough for any hunt, but with smaller boats or even a kayak you get a whole different experience.
 In Finland, so many people sail in their leisure time that the ratio of boats to people is one in seven or eight.
 The figure is equal to the figure of Norway, Sweden and New Zealand. Furthermore, it is quite unique (in the Netherlands, for example, the figure is one in forty).
 At most Baltic cruises, a long stay in St Petersburg, Russia, is included.
 You can spend several full days in the historic town and spend the night on the ship.
 Since 2009, you do not need a separate visa if you only go ashore during a boat excursion.
 Some cruises include a visit to the German capital Berlin, but as you can see on the map, Berlin is not close to the sea.
 Flying can be scary for people of all backgrounds and ages, especially if they've never flown before or if they've had a traumatic experience.
 It's not something to be ashamed of: it's not any different than many fears that other people also have.
 If you know how planes work, it can contribute to taking away a fear that comes from the unknown or from the fact that you have no control over the plane.
 Courier companies get a generous fee to deliver items quickly. For business documents, shopping or spare parts for a necessary repair, time often plays a very important role.
 Larger companies could use their own planes for certain routes, but for other routes and smaller companies it became more difficult.
 If they're shipping things via air transport, it can take days on some routes before they're unloaded and go through customs.
 Only as checked baggage could this be processed more quickly, according to the rules of airlines,
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay for this privilege with a bag of money, or even better, to have your employer pay for it.
 This is not cheap, however: the rule of thumb is that you pay about four times economy class for business, and about eleven times for first class.
 It is generally not worthwhile to search for discounts for business class or first class tickets on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know only too well that there is a group of flyers who are prepared to pay a lot of money to get somewhere fast and comfortably, and the airlines charge them accordingly.
 Chişinău is the Moldavian capital, where the Romanian language is spoken, but also the Russian language is spoken a lot.
 As a multi-ethnic Republic, Moldova went under ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in the east of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognised by the UN.
 There are new economic ties between these two parts of Moldova, despite the fact that political negotiations have failed.
 Orthodox Christianity is the main religion in Moldova.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with about 3.7 million inhabitants, the largest port after Istanbul and a good transportation hub.
 The once ancient city of Izmir is now a modern, developed and busy commercial center on a Bay and is surrounded by mountains.
 The broad boulevards, the glass buildings and the modern shopping centers that are covered with red tiles, the 18th-century markets, the old mosques and churches, but still feels more like a Mediterranean, European city than traditionally Turkish.
 In the village of Haldarsvík, you enjoy views of the nearby Island of Eysturoy, as well as a special church with eight corners.
 On a number of graves near the church are fine marble Dove Sculptures.
 If you have half an hour, you should certainly take a look around this village.
 In the north you'll find the good, reachable, romantic and fascinating place Sintra. Sintra became famous with foreigners after Lord Byron spoke with lofty praise about the beautiful monuments there.
 Scotturb-bus 403 rides regularly to Sintra, with a stop in Cabo da Roca.
 Go also to the north and visit the beautiful Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima, where internationally renowned Marian apparitions took place.
 Remember that you are actually just visiting a mass grave, but also a place that for a large part of the world's population has a meaning that is almost unmeasurable.
 Many men and women who have survived their time here are still alive and many of them have loved ones who were murdered or worked themselves to death, both Jews and non-Jews.
 Toon during your visit all appropriate respect, solemnity and dignity. Trivialise the Holocaust or Nazism not.
 Do not damage the site by marking or graffiti on the buildings.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants prefer Catalan, the great majority can understand it, and nearly everyone speaks Spanish.
 Most signs are in Catalan, though, because that's the first official language, according to the law.
 In public transport and other facilities, Spanish is spoken frequently.
 Ordinary announcements in the Metro are only in Catalan, but unscheduled interruptions are done by a computerized system in different languages, including French, Arabic, Spanish, English and also in Japanese.
 The inhabitants of Paris are known for being egotistical, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is usually just a false stereotype, it can't hurt to put your best foot forward in Paris and behave like someone who's bien élevé.
 The hard exterior of the Parisians disappears quickly when you show that you are familiar with their way of doing things.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested and this heavily forested area consists mainly of beech, spruce and fir, and includes a combination of alpine and Mediterranean flora.
 There are very many different plant communities, because of the different microclimates, the different soil types and the varying altitude differences.
 This area is also the habitat of a very wide range of animal and bird species.
 There are rare animals such as the European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat and the Auerhoen, as well as many more common species.
 When women visit a monastery, they are required to wear a skirt to over the knees and their shoulders must be covered.
 Mostly you get a towel as a woman if you arrive unprepared at a monastery, but should you bring your own example with you, with nice screaming colors, the monk or nun at the entrance will smile at you friendly.
 On the other hand, men must wear trousers to at least over the knee.
 You can also borrow these from the stock at the entrance, but these clothes are not washed after each use, so you might feel uncomfortable wearing them.
 Like many other Mediterranean cuisines, Mallorcan cuisine is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses a lot of olive oil.
 A simple and popular dish for dinner, mainly during the summer months, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes and whatever is available in terms of flavorings, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 Independent nouns, like Sie, which means you, always have a capital letter at the beginning, even if they are in the middle of the sentence.
 In this way you make a pronounciation difference between a number of verbs and nouns.
 It makes reading probably easier, though, because writing is more complicated, because you have to figure out whether a verb or an adjective is used as a noun.
 Most Italian words are spelled exactly as they are pronounced, so the pronunciation generally poses little problem.
 You have to pay the most attention to the c and the g. The pronunciation of those depends on the vowel that follows.
 Also, the r and rr are pronounced differently: caro means liefje, while carro means wagen.
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Reading this introduction to the grammar will teach you a lot about the grammar of Persian and help you to understand sentences.
 It is quite logical that if you know a Romance language, it is easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 But people who speak a little Spanish can quickly conclude that Portuguese sounds so much like it that you don't have to learn it separately.
 Pre-Modern Observatories are now obsolete, and serve as museums or educational attractions.
 Light pollution was not as much of a problem then as it is now, so they were often built in cities or on campuses, better accessible than they are today.
 Most modern research telescopes are enormous facilities built in remote areas with favourable atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami is the viewing of cherry blossom and this has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 In China, the prunus bloom was the favorite flower and that's where the concept came from.
 The first cherry blossom festivals of Japan were organized by the emperor and were only intended for himself and other aristocrats at the Imperial court.
 Plants look their best in a natural environment, so you need to suppress the tendency to remove even just one species.
 When you collect samples during a visit to a landscaped garden, you are immediately and without discussion denied access to the garden.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to live, very easy to navigate and almost everything is available once you arrive.
 But as you're in the high tropics, but a few degrees north of the equator, you experience both heat (always) and powerful sun (when the air is clear, this happens less often).
 There are also some buses going in a northerly direction to Hebron, the overlooked burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Isaac, Jacob, Abraham and their wives.
 Look carefully to see if the bus you are taking to Hebron actually goes to Kiryat Arba, a nearby Jewish settlement.
 Inland waterways can be a good holiday destination.
 You can visit castles in the Loire Valley or the Rhine Valley, book a cruise to the interesting cities along the Danube or take a boat trip along the Erie Canal.
 They also give popular walking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of Christianity, where the birth of Jesus is celebrated.
 People who do not believe in Christian countries and Non-Christians around the world have also adopted many traditions that are associated with the holiday.
 There is a tradition whereby you stay up all Easter night until you can see the sunrise at a given moment.
 Naturally enough, there are Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 In traditional churches, a Easter Vigil is often held on the Saturday evening of the Easter weekend, where congregations often celebrate at midnight a feast in honor of the resurrection of Christ.
 All animals that originally came to the Islands came here by swimming, flying or drifting.
 Because of the long distance from the continent, it was not possible for mammals to make the journey, so the giant tortoise became the most common grazing mammal on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since man set foot on the Galapagos, there have been all sorts of introduced mammals, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 During the winter, in the Arctic and Antarctic, the sun does not actually rise.
 There is a good chance you may see the Aurora Borealis, since the sky will be dark most of the day and night.
 The areas are sparsely populated and therefore light pollution is not a problem, meaning you can also enjoy the starry sky.
 The Japanese work environment is structured and more formal than in the Western world.
 Pakken are standard work clothing and colleagues call each other by their last name or function name.
 On the Internet, elements of both mass and interpersonal communication are combined.
 Workers often need permission from their supervisors before they can make a decision and are expected to follow the instructions of their supervisors without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.28056427151208224, 'precisions': [0.612568890351238, 0.34615054501759507, 0.21884253028263795, 0.14277657674593477], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9833999969196658, 'length_ratio': 0.9835362647142106, 'translation_length': 24314, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 56.57622864701967, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}